uz_UZ.aff
SFX X 0 ayotgandadir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganda-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgandadir-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgandamikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganda-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganim [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimdir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganim-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimdir-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimmikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganim-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimni [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimnimi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimnidir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimni-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimnidir-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimnimikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimni-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimning [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimningmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimningdir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimning-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimningdir-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimningmikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimning-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimga [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimgami [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimgadir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimga-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimgadir-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimgamikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimga-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimdan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimdanmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimdandir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimdan-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimdandir-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimdanmikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimdan-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimda [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimdami [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimdadir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimda-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimdadir-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimdamikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimda-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimiz [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimizmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimizdir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimiz-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimizdir-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimizmikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimiz-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimizni [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimiznimi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimiznidir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimizni-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimiznidir-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimiznimikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimizni-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimizning [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimizningmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimizningdir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimizning-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimizningdir-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimizningmikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimizning-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimizga [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimizgami [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimizgadir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimizga-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimizgadir-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimizgamikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimizga-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimizdan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimizdanmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimizdandir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimizdan-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimizdandir-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimizdanmikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimizdan-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimizda [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimizdami [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimizdadir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimizda-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimizdadir-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimizdamikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimizda-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganing [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingdir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganing-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingdir-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingmikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganing-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingni [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingnimi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingnidir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingni-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingnidir-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingnimikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingni-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingning [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingningmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingningdir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingning-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingningdir-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingningmikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingning-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingga [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganinggami [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganinggadir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingga-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganinggadir-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganinggamikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingga-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingdan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingdanmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingdandir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingdan-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingdandir-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingdanmikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingdan-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingda [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingdami [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingdadir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingda-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingdadir-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingdamikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingda-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingiz [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingizmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingizdir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingiz-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingizdir-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingizmikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingiz-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingizni [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingiznimi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingiznidir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingizni-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingiznidir-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingiznimikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingizni-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingizning [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingizningmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingizningdir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingizning-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingizningdir-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingizningmikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingizning-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingizga [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingizgami [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingizgadir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingizga-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingizgadir-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingizgamikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingizga-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingizdan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingizdanmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingizdandir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingizdan-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingizdandir-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingizdanmikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingizdan-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingizda [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingizdami [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingizdadir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingizda-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingizdadir-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingizdamikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganingizda-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgani [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganidir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgani-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganidir-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganimikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgani-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganini [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganinimi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganinidir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganini-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganinidir-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganinimikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganini-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganining [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganiningmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganiningdir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganining-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganiningdir-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganiningmikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganining-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganiga [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganigami [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganigadir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganiga-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganigadir-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganigamikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganiga-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganidan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganidanmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganidandir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganidan-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganidandir-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganidanmikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganidan-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganida [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganidami [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganidadir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganida-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganidadir-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganidamikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganida-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganlar [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganlarmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganlardir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganlar-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganlardir-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganlarmikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganlar-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganlarni [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganlarnimi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganlarnidir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganlarni-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganlarnidir-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganlarnimikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganlarni-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganlarning [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganlarningmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganlarningdir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganlarning-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganlarningdir-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganlarningmikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganlarning-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganlarga [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganlargami [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganlargadir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotganlarga-da [^aeiou]
