uz_UZ.dic
achchiqlanish/X
adabiylashtir/X
afsunla/X
ajablan/X
ajrimla/X
akslan/X
alang-jalanglan/X
aliflash/X
almashinil/X
amallash/X
anglanil/X
anqay/X
aralashil/X
ardoqla/X
arralat/X
arzonlat/X
asoslantir/X
astarla/X
avayla/X
avtorlashtir/X
aybla/X
aylantirish/X
ayqirtir/X
ayttiril/X
babalash/X
badnafslash/X
baholash/X
balandlat/X
baqirtir/X
barkamollash/X
baslash/X
bayirlash/X
behollan/X
beklan/X
bella/X
beril/X
beshovlat/X
betlat/X
bezantir/X
bezillat/X
bich/X
bijirlat/X
bilintiril/X
bil/X
biriktiril/X
bitish/X
bobirla/X
boʻgʻdirtir/X
boʻgʻ/X
boʻlashtir/X
boʻra/X
boʻshaltir/X
boʻtal/X
boʻylan/X
boʻzray/X
boplat/X
bordonla/X
boshoqlat/X
bosol/X
botqizdir/X
budurlan/X
bukishtir/X
bulgʻalan/X
buratil/X
burishtir/X
burrolan/X
butrash/X
buyuttir/X
chagʻilla/X
chalgʻitish/X
chalpi/X
changallat/X
chapillat/X
chaqchay/X
chaqna/X
charmla/X
chat/X
chaynattir/X
chechanlash/X
chekiltir/X
cherttir/X
chigallan/X
chilpin/X
chimit/X
chiqarol/X
chiqish/X
chirmashtir/X
chirsilla/X
chiyla/X
chizilla/X
choʻchit/X
choʻkkalat/X
choʻmiltiril/X
choʻqishtir/X
choʻzdiril/X
chopin/X
chorlash/X
chuchula/X
chulgʻa/X
chuvalashtir/X
chuvi/X
dadillash/X
dambalat/X
darajala/X
darmonsizlash/X
davlatlashtir/X
daydi/X
dekretlashtiril/X
depsi/X
dikanglat/X
dilgirlan/X
dirillat/X
doʻmbay/X
doʻrillat/X
dudla/X
dutla/X
ekil/X
emaklash/X
eplash/X
eshkakla/X
ezilish/X
faxrlantir/X
galdirakla/X
gaplash/X
gʻagʻirla/X
gʻazablantir/X
gʻingʻgʻingʻlash/X
gʻiytillat/X
gʻujlan/X
gijingla/X
gruppalash/X
gurillat/X
guvullat/X
hansirat/X
havoyilan/X
hazillash/X
hisoblashish/X
hovuchla/X
hushsizlantir/X
identifikatsiyala/X
ildamlash/X
iljayt/X
indiril/X
inla/X
ionlashtir/X
irvaytir/X
ishqash/X
isqirtlan/X
ixchamlan/X
izlan/X
jagʻirlat/X
jasurlan/X
jildirat/X
jimirla/X
jivilla/X
joʻshla/X
juganlat/X
kaltaklan/X
karilla/X
kavsharla/X
kekkay/X
keptiril/X
ketkaz/X
kirdir/X
kishtla/X
kodlash/X
koʻmiltir/X
koʻpirtir/X
koʻtartiril/X
konsentratsiyalan/X
kovlattir/X
kudungla/X
kurash/X
kuymalan/X
laqillat/X
liqilla/X
lovullat/X
magnitlan/X
maqtan/X
mavjlantir/X
maʼrash/X
migratsiyala/X
minalat/X
mixlattir/X
moʻltirash/X
motorlash/X
muhrla/X
munkilla/X
mutakabbirlash/X
namiq/X
nayzalan/X
niqtal/X
nokaslash/X
novdalan/X
obdira/X
ochkoʻzlash/X
ogʻ/X
oʻgʻirla/X
oʻlcha/X
oʻngla/X
oʻqtal/X
oʻrkachlan/X
oʻsmoqchila/X
oʻtkizish/X
oʻydiril/X
oʻzakla/X
oldinlashtir/X
oltovlash/X
oqar/X
orqalan/X
oshiril/X
otol/X
oyoqlat/X
palidla/X
parlat/X
patilla/X
pichirlat/X
pirqillat/X
pissay/X
poʻkpoʻkla/X
porla/X
puchay/X
qadamlat/X
qalaylat/X
qamsa/X
qarash/X
qashit/X
qatronla/X
qaynatish/X
qerala/X
qimirlash/X
qirqil/X
qistiril/X
qiynash/X
qizdiril/X
qoʻllash/X
qoʻrgʻoshinlan/X
qoʻzgʻatil/X
qonlash/X
qoqlan/X
qovuril/X
quldurat/X
qurillash/X
qurush/X
quvlash/X
quyuqlash/X
rasmiylashtiril/X
rejala/X
rosalan/X
sakrash/X
sandira/X
sarflat/X
saylanish/X
selpin/X
seroblash/X
shablonlashtiril/X
shalpaytir/X
sharaflan/X
shavqlan/X
shikvalan/X
shimi/X
shirtilla/X
shoʻngʻit/X
shovqinla/X
shuva/X
siljittir/X
sinchikla/X
siqimla/X
sirqira/X
siypa/X
soddalan/X
soʻldirtir/X
soʻrgʻichlat/X
solqilan/X
soxtalashtir/X
sugʻoril/X
suqlan/X
surkattir/X
suvsattir/X
suyuntir/X
taftishla/X
taktaklat/X
tamgʻala/X
tanlat/X
taqinish/X
taraqqiylan/X
tarqa/X
tashkillashtiril/X
tatin/X
taysalla/X
tebral/X
tekshirtir/X
tepkilan/X
teshala/X
tigʻlash/X
tila/X
tinchish/X
tipiklashtir/X
tirgʻantir/X
tirnat/X
titiltir/X
tizil/X
toʻgʻrilattir/X
toʻlgʻizish/X
toʻntar/X
toʻqmoqlash/X
toʻygʻaz/X
tolpin/X
topshirish/X
torttir/X
toy/X
tugil/X
tupla/X
turtinish/X
tutamlat/X
tuydir/X
uchir/X
uhuhla/X
umidlantiril/X
unniqtir/X
urishtir/X
uval/X
uygʻoqlan/X
uza/X
vagʻirla/X
vaqilla/X
vengerchala/X
vohvohla/X
xanjarla/X
xavfsira/X
xiralan/X
xoʻmrayish/X
xomitla/X
xunuklan/X
yalangʻochlan/X
yaltanglan/X
yapaloqlan/X
yaroqsizlantir/X
yashna/X
yechintirish/X
yelpittir/X
yetakla/X
yigʻilol/X
yiriklash/X
yogʻlat/X
yoʻqlattir/X
yolgʻizla/X
yondiril/X
yoqtirgʻiz/X
yoshlat/X
yoyilinqira/X
yugurgila/X
yumaloqla/X
yuqorilatil/X
yuvdiril/X
zambilla/X
zavqlan/X
ziqnalan/X
zonallashtiril/X
